Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-309
Municipal corporation, defined.

For purposes of sections 13-308 and 13-309, municipal corporation shall mean any county, township, city, or village, whether organized and existing under direct provisions of the Constitution of Nebraska or statutes of this state, or by virtue of charters or other corporate articles or instruments executed under authority of the Constitution or statutes of this state.

Laws 1975, LB 307, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1731.